Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 2 APPROPRIATION OF WATER — PERMITS, CERTIFICATES, AND LICENSES — SURVEY
§ 42-221. Fees of department.

The department of water resources shall collect the following fees, which shall constitute a fund to pay for legal advertising, the publication of public notices and for investigations, research, and providing public data as required of the department in the performance of its statutory duties:

For filing an application for a permit to appropriate the public waters of this state:

For filing an application for an extension of time within which to resume the use of water under a vested water right ............................... $100

For filing application for amendment of permit ............................... $100

For a quantity of 0.2 c.f.s. or less or for a storage volume of 20 acre feet or less ............................... $100

For a quantity greater than 0.2 c.f.s. but not exceeding 1.0 c.f.s. or for a storage volume greater than 20 acre feet but not exceeding 100 acre feet ............................... $250

For a quantity greater than 1.0 c.f.s. but not exceeding 20 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 100 acre feet but not exceeding 2,000 acre feet ............................... $250

For a quantity greater than 20.0 c.f.s. but not exceeding 100 c.f.s. or for a storage volume greater than 2,000 acre feet but not exceeding 10,000 acre feet ............................... $1,010

For a quantity greater than 100.0 c.f.s. but not exceeding 500.0 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 10,000 acre feet but not exceeding 50,000 acre feet ............................... $2,610

For a quantity greater than 500 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 50,000 acre feet ............................... $6,610

For any application to change the nature of use of water under one (1) or more vested water right(s), an additional fee of $250 shall apply.

For an application to change only the legal description for the place of use or the point of diversion when there will be no physical change in the location of the place of use or the point of diversion and no unauthorized physical change in the location of the place of use or the point of diversion has occurred inconsistent with the decree, license or transfer defining the water right, the total filing fee shall be $50.00 per water right.

plus $40.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 1.0 c.f.s. or 100 acre feet.

plus $20.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 20.0 c.f.s. or 2,000 acre feet.

plus $10.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 100 c.f.s. or 10,000 acre feet.

plus $2.00 for each additional 1.0 c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 500.0 c.f.s. or 50,000 acre feet.

D.1. For filing claim to use right under section 42-243, Idaho Code
............................... $100

2. For filing a late claim to use a water right under section 42-243, Idaho Code, where the date filed with the department of water resources or, the postmark if mailed to the department of water resources, is:

i. After June 30, 1998 ............................... $250

ii. After June 30, 2005 ............................... $500

iii. For every ten (10) years after June 30, 2005, an additional ............................... $500

E. For filing an assignment of permit ............................... $25.00

F. For readvertising application for permit, change, exchange, or extension to resume use ............................... $50.00
G. For certification, each document ............................... $1.00

H. For making photocopies of office records, maps and documents for

public use ............................... A reasonable charge as determined by the department.

I. For filing request for extension of time within which to submit proof of beneficial use on a water right permit ............................... $50.00

J. For tasks requiring in excess of one (1) hour research or for computerized data provided for public use ...............................

............................... A reasonable charge as determined by the department.

K. For filing proof of beneficial use of water and requests for water right license examinations, a fee based upon the rate of diversion claimed in the proof of beneficial use:

1. For a quantity of 0.2 c.f.s. or less, or for a storage volume of 20 acre feet or less ............................... $50.00

except no fee shall be charged for domestic use for which a permit is not required.

2. For a quantity greater than 0.2 c.f.s. but not exceeding 1.0 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 20 acre feet, but not exceeding 100 acre feet ............................... $100

3. For a quantity greater than 1.0 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 100 acre feet ............................... $100

plus $25.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof, or 100 acre feet or part thereof, over the first 1.0 c.f.s. or 100 acre feet with a maximum fee not to exceed $600.

L. For filing a protest or request to intervene in a protested
matter ............................... $25.00

M. For filing an application to alter a stream channel pursuant to chapter 38, title 42, Idaho Code:

1. Application for recreational dredge permits by residents of the
state ............................... $10.00

2. Application for recreational dredge permits by nonresidents of the state ............................... $30.00

3. Other applications ............................... $20.00

N. For receipt of all notices of application within a designated area, a reasonable annual charge as determined by the department.

O. For filing an application to change the point of diversion, place, period or nature of use of water under a vested water right:

1. For a quantity of 0.2 c.f.s. or less, or for a storage volume of 20 acre feet or less ............................... $200

2. For a quantity greater than 0.2 c.f.s. but not exceeding 1.0 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 20 acre feet but not exceeding 100 acre feet ............................... $500

3. For a quantity greater than 1.0 c.f.s. but not exceeding 20 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 100 acre feet but not exceeding 2,000 acre feet ............................... $500

plus $80.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 1.0 c.f.s. or 100 acre feet.

4. For a quantity greater than 20.0 c.f.s. but not exceeding 100 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 2,000 acre feet but not exceeding 10,000 acre feet ............................... $2,020

plus $40.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 20.0 c.f.s. or 2,000 acre feet.

5. For a quantity greater than 100 c.f.s. but not exceeding 500 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 10,000 acre feet but not exceeding 50,000 acre feet ............................... $5,220
plus $20.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 100 c.f.s. or 10,000 acre feet.

6. For a quantity greater than 500 c.f.s., or for a storage volume greater than 50,000 acre feet ............................... $13,220

plus $4.00 for each additional c.f.s. or part thereof or 100 acre feet or part thereof over the first 500 c.f.s. or 50,000 acre feet.

P. For filing a notice of land application of effluent as required by section 42-201(8), Idaho Code ............................... $150

All fees received by the department of water resources under the provisions of this chapter shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the water administration account.

§ 42-222. Change in point of diversion, place of use, period of use, or nature of use of water under established rights — Forfeiture and extension — Appeals.

Any person, entitled to the use of water whether represented by license issued by the department of water resources, by claims to water rights by reason of diversion and application to a beneficial use as filed under the provisions of this chapter, or by decree of the court, who shall desire to change the point of diversion, place of use, period of use or nature of use of all or part of the water, under the right shall first make application to the department of water resources for approval of such change. Such application shall be upon forms furnished by the department and shall describe the right licensed, claimed or decreed which is to be changed and the changes which are proposed, and shall be accompanied by the statutory filing fee as in this chapter provided. Upon receipt of such application it shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to examine same, obtain any consent required in section 42-108, Idaho Code, and if otherwise proper to provide notice of the proposed change in a similar manner as applications under section 42-203A, Idaho Code. Such notice shall advise that anyone who desires to protest the proposed change shall file notice of protests with the department within ten (10) days of the last date of publication. Upon the receipt of any protest, accompanied by the statutory filing fee as provided in section 42-221, Idaho Code, it shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to investigate the same and to conduct a hearing thereon. He shall also advise the watermaster of the district in which such water is used of the proposed change and the watermaster shall notify the director of the department of water resources of his recommendation on the application, and the director of the department of water resources shall not finally determine the action on the application for change until he has received from such watermaster his recommendation thereof, which action of the watermaster shall be received and considered as other evidence. For applications proposing to change only the point of diversion or place of use of a water right in a manner that will not change the effect on the source for the right and any other hydraulically-connected sources from the effect resulting under the right as previously approved, and that will not affect the rights of other water users, the director of the department of water resources shall give only such notice to other users as he deems appropriate.

All rights to the use of water acquired under this chapter or otherwise shall be lost and forfeited by a failure for the term of five (5) years to apply it to the beneficial use for which it was appropriated and when any right to the use of water shall be lost through nonuse or forfeiture such rights to such water shall revert to the state and be again subject to appropriation under this chapter; except that any right to the use of water shall not be lost through forfeiture by the failure to apply the water to beneficial use under certain circumstances as specified in section 42-223, Idaho Code. The party asserting that a water right has been forfeited has the burden of proving the forfeiture by clear and convincing evidence.

Upon proper showing before the director of the department of water resources of good and sufficient reason for nonapplication to beneficial use of such water for such term of five (5) years, the director of the department of water resources is hereby authorized to grant an extension of time extending the time for forfeiture of title for nonuse thereof, to such waters for a period of not to exceed five (5) additional years.
(4) Application for an extension shall be made before the end of the five (5) year period upon forms to be furnished by the department of water resources and shall fully describe the right on which an extension of time to resume the use is requested and the reasons for such nonuse and shall be accompanied by the statutory filing fee; provided that water rights protected from forfeiture under the provisions of section 42-223, Idaho Code, are exempt from this requirement.

Upon the receipt of such application it shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to examine the same and to provide notice of the application for an extension in the same manner as applications under section 42-203A, Idaho Code. The notice shall fully describe the right, the extension which is requested and the reason for such nonuse and shall state that any person desiring to object to the requested extension may submit a protest, accompanied by the statutory filing fee as provided in section 42-221, Idaho Code, to the director of the department of water resources within ten (10) days of the last date of publication.

Upon receipt of a protest it shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to investigate and conduct a hearing thereon as in this chapter provided.

The director of the department of water resources shall find from the evidence presented in any hearing, or from information available to the department, the reasons for such nonuse of water and where it appears to the satisfaction of the director of the department of water resources that other rights will not be impaired by granting an extension of time within which to resume the use of the water and good cause appearing for such nonuse, he may grant one (1) extension of five (5) years within which to resume such use.

In his approval of the application for an extension of time under this section the director of the department of water resources shall set the date when the use of water is to be resumed. Sixty (60) days before such date the director of the department of water resources shall forward to the applicant at his address of record a notice by certified mail setting forth the date on which the use of water is to be resumed and a form for reporting the resumption of the use of the water right. If the use of the water has not been resumed and report thereon made on or before the date set for resumption of use such right shall revert to the state and again be subject to appropriation, as provided in this section.

In the event the director of the department of water resources determines that a proposed extension of time within which to resume use of a water right shall not be approved as provided in this section, he shall deny same and forward notice of such action to the applicant by certified mail, which decision shall be subject to judicial review as hereafter provided.

When the nature of use of the water right is to be changed to municipal purposes and some or all of the right will be held by a municipal provider to serve reasonably anticipated future needs, the municipal provider shall provide to the department sufficient information and documentation to establish that the applicant qualifies as a municipal provider and that the reasonably anticipated future needs, the service area and the planning horizon are consistent with the definitions and requirements specified in this chapter. The service area need not be described by legal description nor by description of every intended use in detail, but the area must be described with sufficient information to identify the general location where the water under the water right is to be used and the types and quantity of uses that generally will be made.
When a water right or a portion thereof to be changed is held by a municipal provider for municipal purposes, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, that portion of the right held for reasonably anticipated future needs at the time of the change shall not be changed to a place of use outside the service area, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, or to a new nature of use.

The director of the department of water resources shall examine all the evidence and available information and shall approve the change in whole, or in part, or upon conditions, provided no other water rights are injured thereby, the change does not constitute an enlargement in use of the original right, the change is consistent with the conservation of water resources within the state of Idaho and is in the local public interest as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, the change will not adversely affect the local economy of the watershed or local area within which the source of water for the proposed use originates, in the case where the place of use is outside of the watershed or local area where the source of water originates, and the new use is a beneficial use, which in the case of a municipal provider shall be satisfied if the water right is necessary to serve reasonably anticipated future needs as provided in this chapter. The director may consider consumptive use, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, as a factor in determining whether a proposed change would constitute an enlargement in use of the original water right. The director shall not approve a change in the nature of use from agricultural use where such change would significantly affect the agricultural base of the local area. The transfer of the right to the use of stored water for irrigation purposes shall not constitute an enlargement in use of the original right even though more acres may be irrigated, if no other water rights are injured thereby. A copy of the approved application for change shall be returned to the applicant and he shall be authorized upon receipt thereof to make the change and the original water right shall be presumed to have been amended by reason of such authorized change. In the event the director of the department of water resources determines that a proposed change shall not be approved as provided in this section, he shall deny the same and forward notice of such action to the applicant by certified mail, which decision shall be subject to judicial review as hereafter set forth. Provided however, minimum stream flow water rights may not be established under the local public interest criterion, and may only be established pursuant to chapter 15, title 42, Idaho Code.

Section 4 of S.L. 1981, ch. 147 declared an emergency. Approved March 27, 1981.
CASE NOTES

§ 42-222A. Temporary changes during drought conditions.

Upon declaration of a drought emergency for an area designated by the director of the department of water resources and approved by the governor of the state of Idaho, the director of the department of water resources is authorized to allow temporary changes to the use of water rights consisting of temporary transfers to change point of diversion, place and purpose of use of valid existing water rights or temporary exchanges of water authorized to be diverted under water rights, as provided in section 42-240, Idaho Code, when the director of the department of water resources determines that such change(s) can be accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Application for a temporary change shall be made upon forms provided by the department of water resources and shall be accompanied by an application fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per application.

The director of the department of water resources is not required to publish notice of the proposed change pursuant to the provisions of section 42-211, 42-222(1) or 42-240, Idaho Code, and is not required to make findings as provided in said sections. A temporary change may be approved upon completion of the application form, payment of the filing fee and a determination by the director of the department of water resources that the proposed change can be properly administered and there is no information that the change will injure any other water right. If the water right to be changed is administered by a watermaster within a water district, the director of the department of water resources shall obtain and consider the recommendations of the watermaster before approving the temporary change application.

All temporary changes approved pursuant to the provisions of this section shall expire on the date shown in the approval which shall not be later than December 31 of the year in which the emergency transfer approval is made and thereafter the water right shall revert to the point of diversion and place of use existing prior to the temporary change. Nothing herein shall be construed as approval to authorize the construction of a new well as a new point of diversion.

The recipient of an approved temporary change issued pursuant to this section shall assume all risk that the diversion and use of the water may cause injury to other water rights, that the change constitutes an enlargement in use of the original right, that the use is not consistent with the conservation of water resources within the state of Idaho and that such use is not in the local public interest. Any applicant for a temporary change who is aggrieved by a denial by the director of the department of water resources of a temporary change pursuant to this section may request a hearing pursuant to the provisions of section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code, and may seek judicial review of the final order of the director pursuant to the provisions of section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.

§ 42-223. Exceptions or defenses to forfeiture.

A right to the use of water shall not be lost by forfeiture pursuant to the provisions of section 42-222, Idaho Code, for a failure to apply the water to beneficial use under the conditions specified in any subsection of this section. The legislature does not intend through enactment of this section to diminish or impair any statutory or common law exception or defense to forfeiture existing on the date of enactment or amendment of this section, or to preclude judicial or administrative recognition of other exceptions or defenses to forfeiture recognized in Idaho case law or other provisions of the Idaho Code. No provision of this section shall be construed to imply that the legislature does not recognize the existence or validity of any common law exception or defense to forfeiture existing on the date of enactment or amendment of this section.

A water right appurtenant to land contracted in a federal cropland set-aside program shall not be lost or forfeited for nonuse during the contracted period. The running of any five (5) year period of nonuse for forfeiture of a water right shall be tolled during the time that the land remains in the cropland set-aside program.

A water right held by a municipal provider to meet reasonably anticipated future needs shall be deemed to constitute beneficial use, and such rights shall not be lost or forfeited for nonuse unless the planning horizon specified in the license has expired and the quantity of water authorized for use under the license is no longer needed to meet reasonably anticipated future needs.

A water right shall not be lost or forfeited by a failure to divert and apply the water to beneficial use if the water is not needed to maintain full beneficial use under the right because of land application of waste for disposal purposes including, but not limited to, discharge from dairy lagoons used in combination with or substituted for water diverted under the water right.

A water right shall not be lost or forfeited by a failure to divert and apply the water to beneficial use if the reason for the nonuse of the water is to comply with the provisions of a ground water management plan approved by the director of the department of water resources pursuant to section 42-233a or 42-233b, Idaho Code.

A water right shall not be lost or forfeited by a failure of the owner of the right to divert and apply the water to beneficial use while the water right is placed in the water supply bank or is retained in or rented from the water supply bank pursuant to sections 42-1761 through 42-1765A, Idaho Code, or while the water right is leased pursuant to sections 43-335 through 43-342, Idaho Code, or sections 42-2501 through 42-2509, Idaho Code, or while use of the water is made under any other provision of law authorizing the rental or lease of water rights.

No portion of any water right shall be lost or forfeited for nonuse if the nonuse results from circumstances over which the water right owner has no control. Whether the water right owner has control over nonuse of water shall be determined on a case-by-case basis.

No portion of a water right held by an irrigation district, a Carey Act operating company, or any other company, corporation, association, or entity which holds water rights for distribution to its landowners, shareholders or members shall be lost or forfeited due to nonuse by such landowners, shareholders or members, unless the nonuse is subject to the control of such entity.
(8) No portion of a water right held by an irrigation district shall be lost, forfeited or subject to forfeiture as a result of the exclusion of land from the district pursuant to chapter 11, title 43, Idaho Code, so long as any five (5) year period of nonuse following the exclusion does not result from circumstances over which the district has control.

Instituted proceedings to declare a forfeiture;

Obtained a valid water right authorizing the use of such water with a priority date prior to the resumption of use; or

Used the water made available by nonuse pursuant to an existing water right.

(9) No portion of any water right shall be lost or forfeited for nonuse if the nonuse results from a water conservation practice, which maintains the full beneficial use authorized by the water right, as defined in section 42-250, Idaho Code.

(10) No portion of any water right shall be lost or forfeited for nonuse if the nonuse results from the water right being used for mitigation purposes approved by the director of the department of water resources including as a condition of approval for a new water right appropriation approved pursuant to section 42-203A, Idaho Code, a water right transfer approved pursuant to section 42-222, Idaho Code, a water exchange approved pursuant to section 42-240, Idaho Code, or a mitigation plan approved in accordance with rules promulgated pursuant to section 42-603, Idaho Code.

(11) No portion of any water right with a beneficial use related to mining, mineral processing or milling shall be lost or forfeited for nonuse, so long as the nonuse results from a closure, suspension or reduced production of the mine, processing facility or mill due in whole or in part to mineral prices, if the mining property has a valuable mineral, as defined in section 47-1205, Idaho Code, and the water right owner has maintained the property and mineral rights for potential future mineral production.

(12) No portion of any water right shall be lost or forfeited for nonuse if, after the five (5) year period of nonuse, use of the water is resumed prior to a claim of right by a third party. A third party has made a claim of right if the party has:

§ 42-224. Forfeiture of stockwater rights.

Whenever the director of the department of water resources receives a petition making a prima facie showing, or finds, on his own initiative based on available information, that a stockwater right has not been put to beneficial use for a term of five (5) years, the director shall expeditiously issue an order to the stockwater right owner to show cause before the director why the stockwater right has not been lost through forfeiture pursuant to section 42-222(2), Idaho Code.

Any order to show cause shall contain the director’s findings.

The director shall serve a copy of any order to show cause on the stockwater right owner by personal service or by certified mail. Personal service may be completed by department personnel or a person authorized to serve process under the Idaho rules of civil procedure. Service by certified mail shall be complete upon receipt of the certified mail. If reasonable efforts to personally serve the order fail, or if the certified mail is returned unclaimed, the director may serve the order by publication by publishing a summary of the order once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the point of diversion is located. Service by publication shall be complete upon the date of the last publication.

If the order affects a stockwater right where the place of use is a federal grazing allotment, the director shall provide a copy of the order to the holder or holders of any livestock grazing permit or lease for said allotment.

The stockwater right owner shall have twenty-one (21) days from completion of service to request in writing a hearing pursuant to section 42-1701A, Idaho Code. If the stockwater right owner fails to timely respond to the order to show cause, the stockwater right shall be considered forfeited, and the director shall issue an order declaring the stockwater right to be forfeited pursuant to section 42-222(2), Idaho Code.

The director may consider multiple stockwater rights held by a single owner in a single order to show cause.

If the stockwater right owner timely requests a hearing, the hearing shall be in accordance with section 42-1701A, Idaho Code, and the rules of procedure promulgated by the director. If, after the hearing, the director confirms that the water right has been lost and forfeited pursuant to section 42-222(2), Idaho Code, the director shall issue an order declaring the water right forfeited. Judicial review of any decision of the director shall be in accordance with section 42-1701A, Idaho Code.

For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

“Stockwater right” means water rights for the watering of livestock meeting the requirements of section 42-1401A(11), Idaho Code.

“Stockwater right owner” as used in this section means the owner of the stockwater right shown in the records of the department of water resources at the time of service of the order to show cause.

This section applies to all stockwater rights except those stockwater rights decreed to the United States based on federal law.

§ 42-225. Survey of appropriations

Duty of department. [Repealed.]

§ 42-225a. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 42-225b. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 42-226. Ground waters are public waters.

The traditional policy of the state of Idaho, requiring the water resources of this state to be devoted to beneficial use in reasonable amounts through appropriation, is affirmed with respect to the ground water resources of this state as said term is hereinafter defined and, while the doctrine of “first in time is first in right” is recognized, a reasonable exercise of this right shall not block full economic development of underground water resources. Prior appropriators of underground water shall be protected in the maintenance of reasonable ground water pumping levels as may be established by the director of the department of water resources as herein provided. In determining a reasonable ground water pumping level or levels, the director of the department of water resources shall consider and protect the thermal and/or artesian pressure values for low temperature geothermal resources and for geothermal resources to the extent that he determines such protection is in the public interest. All ground waters in this state are declared to be the property of the state, whose duty it shall be to supervise their appropriation and allotment to those diverting the same for beneficial use. This act shall not affect the rights to the use of ground water in this state acquired before its enactment.

Any application for a water permit that seeks to transfer ground water outside the immediate ground water basin as defined by the director of the department of water resources for the purpose of irrigating five thousand (5,000) or more acres on a continuing basis or for a total volume in excess of ten thousand (10,000) acre feet per year, the application must first be approved by the director of the department of water resources and then by the Idaho legislature. Each shall give due consideration to the local economic and ecological impact of the project or development so proposed.

§ 42-227. Drilling and use of wells for domestic purposes excepted.

The excavation and opening of wells and the withdrawal of water therefrom for domestic purposes shall not be subject to the permit requirement under section 42-229, Idaho Code; providing such wells and withdrawal devices are subject to inspection by the department of water resources and the department of environmental quality and providing further that the drilling of such wells shall be subject to the licensing provisions of section 42-238, Idaho Code. Rights to ground water for such domestic purposes may be acquired by withdrawal and use.

§ 42-228. Drilling and use of wells for drainage or recovery purposes excepted.

The excavation and opening of wells and the withdrawal of water therefrom for the sole purpose of improving or preserving the utility of land by draining them shall not be forbidden or governed by this act, and, likewise, there shall be excepted from the provisions of this act the excavation and opening of wells and withdrawal of water therefrom by canal companies, irrigation districts, and other owners of irrigation works for the sole purpose of recovering ground water resulting from irrigation under such irrigation works for further use on or drainage of lands to which the established water rights of the parties constructing the wells are appurtenant; providing that the drilling of such wells shall be subject to the licensing provisions of section 42-238, Idaho Code.

§ 42-229. Methods of appropriation. — The right to the use of ground water of this state may be acquired only by appropriation. Such appropriation may be perfected by means of the application permit and license procedure as provided in this act; provided, however, that in the event an appropriation has been commenced by diversion and application to beneficial use prior to the effective date of this act it may be perfected under such method of appropriation. All proceedings commenced prior to the effective date of this act for the acquisition of rights to the use of ground water under the provisions of sections 42-201

42-225, Idaho Code, may be completed under the provisions of said sections and rights to the use of ground water may be thereby acquired. But the administration of all rights to the use of ground water, whenever or however acquired or to be acquired, shall, unless specifically excepted herefrom, be governed by the provisions of this act.

§ 42-230. Definitions.

“Ground water” is all water under the surface of the ground whatever may be the geological structure in which it is standing or moving.

All ground water having a temperature of greater than eighty-five (85) degrees Fahrenheit and less than two hundred twelve (212) degrees Fahrenheit in the bottom of a well shall be classified and administered as a low temperature geothermal resource pursuant to section 42-233, Idaho Code.

All ground water having a temperature of two hundred twelve (212) degrees Fahrenheit or more in the bottom of a well shall be classified as a geothermal resource pursuant to section 42-4002, Idaho Code, and shall be administered as a geothermal resource pursuant to chapter 40, title 42, Idaho Code.

“Well” is an artificial excavation or opening in the ground more than eighteen (18) feet in vertical depth below land surface by which ground water of any temperature is sought or obtained.

“Well driller” is any person or group of persons who excavate or open a well or wells for compensation or otherwise upon the land of the well driller or upon other land. Well driller does not include those persons who construct a well on their own property for their own use without the aid of any power driven mechanical equipment.

“Well drilling” or “drilling” for purposes of this chapter is the act of constructing a new well or deepening or modifying an existing well by any percussion, rotary, boring, digging, jetting, or augering method.

“Water right” is the legal right, however acquired, to the use of water for beneficial purposes.

“Operator” is the employee of the well driller who, through his work at the drilling site, causes the well to be drilled.

“Low temperature geothermal resource well” means a well which is capable of producing a low temperature geothermal resource from which fluids can be produced which have value by virtue of the heat contained therein.

§ 42-231. Duties of the director of the department of water resources.

In addition to other duties prescribed by law, it shall be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to conduct investigations, surveys and studies relative to the extent, nature and location of the ground water resources of this state; and to this end, the director of the department of water resources may, on behalf of the state of Idaho enter into cooperative investigations, researches, and studies with any agency or department of the government of the United States, or any other state or public authority of this state, or private agencies or individuals. It shall likewise be the duty of the director of the department of water resources to control the appropriation and use of the ground water of this state as in this act provided and to do all things reasonably necessary or appropriate to protect the people of the state from depletion of ground water resources contrary to the public policy expressed in this act.

§ 42-232. Ground water recharge program — Negotiations with bureau of reclamation.

The director of the department of water resources is hereby authorized and directed to institute negotiations with the United States bureau of reclamation and the senators and representatives representing the state of Idaho in the congress of the United States for purposes of examining the possibility of incorporating an artificial ground water recharge program or project into those water projects for withdrawal of waters from ground water basins in the Coltman area of Bonneville County, the Menan Buttes area in Madison county, or any other area contemplated by the bureau of reclamation, which have been authorized by congress as a part of the Salmon Falls Creek irrigation project located in Twin Falls county.